Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Chapter 5. Joint and Several Debtors

§ 85-5-1.
Effect of releasing one or more joint debtors.

In all cases of joint or joint and several indebtedness, the creditor may settle or compromise with and release any one or more of such debtors; and the settlement or release shall not affect the right or remedy of the creditor against the other debtors for the amount remaining due and unpaid, and shall not operate to release any of the others of the said debtors; and all mortgages or securities for the said indebtedness shall remain in full force against the debtors not released, in favor of the creditor, and also in favor of such of the debtors as may be entitled to contribution, payment, or reimbursement from others of said debtors, and the right of payment, contribution or reimbursement, as among themselves, shall not be affected by this section; and if any debtor, so released, shall have paid more than his ratable share of the whole debt, the whole amount paid by him shall be credited, and if less than his ratable share, then the full amount of his ratable share shall be credited, and the other debtors shall be liable for the residue.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 38, art. 11; 1857, ch. 47, art. 1; 1871, § 2263; 1880, § 1003; 1892, § 2352; 1906, § 2682; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2169; 1930, § 2027; 1942, § 334.

§ 85-5-3.
Judgment against one debtor does not affect rights against others.

In any action founded on a joint or joint and several bond, covenant, bill of exchange, promissory note, or other contract, or on a contract or liability of copartners, it shall be lawful to sue any one or more of the parties liable on such bond, covenant, bill of exchange, promissory note, or other contract or liability; and separate suits may be brought against the representatives of such of the parties as have died, or joint suits may be brought against the representatives of the deceased party and those who are alive and bound therein; and the rendition of judgment against one or more joint or joint and several debtors shall not affect any right of the plaintiff as to the other parties, unless satisfaction has been obtained.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1134; 1892, § 2353; 1906, § 2683; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2170; 1930, § 2028; 1942, § 335.

§ 85-5-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 311, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 335.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 259]

§ 85-5-7.
Limitation of joint and several liability for damages caused by two or more persons; contribution between joint tortfeasors; determination of percentage of fault; liability of medical defendants for economic and noneconomic damages.

As used in this section, “fault” means an act or omission of a person which is a proximate cause of injury or death to another person or persons, damages to property, tangible or intangible, or economic injury, including, but not limited to, negligence, malpractice, strict liability, absolute liability or failure to warn. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), “fault” shall not include any tort which results from an act or omission committed with a specific wrongful intent. For any premises-liability action, as defined under Section 11-1-66.1(7), alleging injury as a result of the willful, wanton or intentional tortious conduct of a third party on commercial or other real property in the State of Mississippi, “fault” shall include any tort which results from an act or omission committed with a specific wrongful intent.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, in any civil action based on fault, the liability for damages caused by two (2) or more persons shall be several only, and not joint and several and a joint tortfeasor shall be liable only for the amount of damages allocated to him in direct proportion to his percentage of fault. In assessing percentages of fault an employer and the employer’s employee or a principal and the principal’s agent shall be considered as one (1) defendant when the liability of such employer or principal has been caused by the wrongful or negligent act or omission of the employee or agent.

Nothing in this section shall eliminate or diminish any defenses or immunities which currently exist, except as expressly noted herein.

Joint and several liability shall be imposed on all who consciously and deliberately pursue a common plan or design to commit a tortious act, or actively take part in it. Any person held jointly and severally liable under this section shall have a right of contribution from his fellow defendants acting in concert.

In actions involving joint tortfeasors, the trier of fact shall determine the percentage of fault for each party alleged to be at fault without regard to whether the joint tortfeasor is immune from damages. Fault allocated under this subsection to an immune tortfeasor or a tortfeasor whose liability is limited by law shall not be reallocated to any other tortfeasor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a cause of action. Nothing in this section shall be construed, in any way, to alter the immunity of any person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 2002, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 4; Laws, 2002, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 4, § 3; Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 6, eff from and after September 1, 2004, and applicable to all causes of action filed on or after September 1, 2004; Laws, 2019, ch. 435, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.